Missouri, session 2026, SB1514.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 252.300, 252.303, 252.306, 252.309,
252.312, 252.315, 252.318, 252.321, 252.324, 252.327, 252.330,
and 252.333, RSMo, are repealed, to read as follows:
[252.300. 1. Sections 252.300 to 252.333
shall be known and may be cited as "The Missouri
Economic Diversification and Afforestation Act
of 1990".
2. It is the intent of sections 252.300 to
252.333 to address environmental, economic, and
social programs with a long-term, integrated
strategy that will result in soil conservation,
improved water and air quality, enhanced
wildlife habitat, increased job opportunities,
and reduced social problems, to the benefit of
all citizens of the state of Missouri.]
[252.303. The department may develop and
implement, in cooperation with the University of
Missouri college of agriculture, the University
of Missouri center for agroforestry, the
University of Missouri extension service, the
Missouri department of natural resources,
private industry councils and the Missouri
department of agriculture, an agroforestry
program. The program shall be designed to
encourage the development of a state program of
agroforestry, and shall encourage soil
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1514 2
conservation and diversifications of the state's
agricultural base through the use of trees
planted in an agroforestry configuration to
accommodate alley cropping, forested-riparian
buffers, silvopasture and windbreaks.]
[252.306. As used in sections 252.300 to
252.333, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Alley cropping", planting rows of
trees at wide spacings and cropping the
alleyways;
(2) "Conservation reserve program", the
conservation reserve program authorized by the
Federal Food Security Act of 1985, as amended,
(Title XII, P.L. 99-198), or its successor
program;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department
of conservation;
(4) "Director", the director of the
Missouri department of conservation;
(5) "Eligible land", agricultural land
which is susceptible to soil erosion that has a
recent cropping history, marginal pastureland,
land surrounding livestock enclosures and
riparian zones;
(6) "Eligible practices", single or
multiple rows of trees, alone or combined with
other plants such as grass, conventional row
crops or horticulture crops, and animals located
at intervals of distance within or around
fields, around livestock enclosures, and along
streams and rivers, specifically designed to
provide production and environmental enhancement
benefits in accordance with the practices
identified in section 252.303;
(7) "Enhancement phase", the period of
time, not to exceed ten years, immediately
following the establishment phase, during which
payments are made by the state of Missouri to
landowners who use their eligible land for
agroforestry purposes as required by the
department;
(8) "Establishment phase", the period of
time during which eligible land is being

SB 1514 3
prepared for planting trees and developing
agroforestry practices, as determined by the
director of the department;
(9) "Forested-riparian buffers", a
combination of trees and other vegetation
established parallel to streams and rivers;
(10) "Silvopasture", combining trees with
forage and livestock;
(11) "Windbreaks", planting single or
multiple rows of trees for protection and
enhanced production of crops and animals.]
[252.309. 1. The director may enter into
agreements with individual landowners to make
incentive payments during the enhancement phase
to landowners. Recipients of such payments
shall utilize the land for which such payment is
made for agroforestry purposes as required by
the director pursuant to sections 252.300 to
252.333.
2. The amount of state incentive payment
made to a landowner per acre of eligible land
shall be an amount which, when added to any cash
or in-kind net income produced by crops raised
on the land, is substantially equal to the
amount per acre previously paid or which would
have been paid to the landowner under the
federal conservation reserve program.
3. If an application made pursuant to
section 252.315 is approved by the director, the
director shall develop a schedule of annual
payments to be made by the state.
4. The state shall not make any payment to
a landowner to maintain the use of eligible land
during the enhancement phase for agroforestry
purposes after ten years have elapsed since the
first such incentive payment is made.]
[252.312. The state payments provided for
in sections 252.309, 252.330, and 252.333 may be
made from funds available to the department of
conservation, soil conservation funds made
available by the department of natural resources
from the tax imposed by Sections 47(a), 47(b)
and 47(c) of Article IV of the Constitution of

SB 1514 4
Missouri, funds appropriated by the general
assembly for that purpose, grants, bequests or
gifts, or any combination thereof.]
[252.315. 1. To participate in the
program, the landowner shall make application to
the director in writing. The written
application shall show the number of acres to be
placed in the program and that the land which is
to be placed in the agroforestry program meets
the eligibility requirements of this section.
The application shall also contain a detailed
plan of the landowner's proposal to meet the
requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333,
including the type and number of trees to be
planted, established, or managed, the type of
compatible grass, other crops and such other
information as may be deemed necessary. The
number of trees required to satisfy eligibility
may vary with agroforestry practice, but in each
case shall be a sufficient number to guarantee
the success of the practice and shall be
consistent with standards established for each
practice.
2. The director shall review each
application. In reviewing the application the
director shall determine the type or types of
soil located in the area of the land proposed to
be included in the agroforestry program and
shall apply the land capability classification
system to determine the potential or limitations
of the land for inclusion in the program.
Before the director acts upon the application,
an on-site inspection shall be made by a
representative of the department of conservation
or its approved agent. The inspecting
representative shall attest to the efficacy of
the agroforestry plan to be used, the number of
acres to be placed under agroforestry
management, the species and number of trees to
be planted, established, or managed, and other
crop components of the proposed program. After
the report of the on-site inspector and the
review by the director, the director shall

SB 1514 5
determine the landowner's eligibility to
participate in the agroforestry program and
shall determine the amount of cost sharing,
including in-kind and labor components, for the
landowner. If the director fails to approve an
application, the aggrieved landowner may request
a hearing before the conservation commission or
its authorized representative within thirty days
of notice to the landowner of the failure of the
conservation department to approve the
application, or the landowner may proceed under
the provisions of section 536.150 as if the act
of the conservation department was one not
subject to administrative review. If an action
is brought pursuant to section 536.150, venue
shall be in Cole County.]
[252.318. 1. All land participating in
the agroforestry program shall be inspected
annually by a representative of the director, to
ensure that the land continues to comply with
the requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333
and that practice specifications are being
maintained in accordance with applicable rules
and regulations.
2. If the annual inspection determines
that the land is no longer in compliance with
the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333 or
with the rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of sections 252.300
to 252.333, the director shall notify the
landowner of that fact and shall detail the
specifics in which the land fails to meet the
requirements. The landowner may respond to the
notice within thirty days of receipt, either by
contesting the inspection report or by providing
the director with a proposal to correct the
problems which form the basis of the notice. If
the landowner contests the findings of the
annual inspection, the aggrieved landowner may
request a hearing before the conservation
commission or its authorized representative or
the landowner may proceed under the provisions
of section 536.150, as if the act of the

SB 1514 6
conservation department was one not subject to
administrative review. If an action is brought
pursuant to section 536.150, venue shall be in
Cole County. If the landowner provides the
director with a proposal to correct the problems
which form the basis of the notice, the director
shall review the proposal and, if the director
finds such proposal acceptable, shall allow the
landowner to implement the proposal to correct
the alleged problems and shall not suspend the
annual payment to the landowner under the
provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333. If
the landowner is unable or unwilling to correct
the alleged problems in a manner acceptable to
the director, the landowner shall not receive
the subsequent payments due under the provisions
of sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.321. The University of Missouri
center for agroforestry and extension service,
in consultation with the director, shall
establish agroforestry demonstration areas, and
develop and deliver the educational components
of sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.324. 1. The director may promulgate
rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333.
Before promulgating any such rule, the director
shall seek the advice and comments of the
University of Missouri college of agriculture,
the University of Missouri center for
agroforestry, the University of Missouri
extension service, the Missouri department of
natural resources, private industry councils,
the Missouri department of economic development
and the Missouri department of agriculture. The
director may seek advice and comments before
promulgating rules and regulations from the
United States Department of Agriculture and any
other entities deemed advisable by the
director. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated under the authority of this chapter
shall become effective unless it has been

SB 1514 7
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 536.
2. The Missouri department of conservation
may contract with the division of soil and water
conservation of the Missouri department of
natural resources for any administrative
functions required under the provisions of
sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.327. 1. The department of
conservation and the department of economic
development and the University of Missouri
college of agriculture shall, by each of the
dates specified in subsection 2 of this section,
jointly produce a report on the agroforestry
program which:
(1) Provides a status report on the
afforestation aspects of the agroforestry
program by presenting a forecast of anticipated
economic developments from the afforestation in
the state as a result of the agroforestry
program;
(2) Suggests public or private sector
initiatives that will potentially serve to
maximize the economic benefits for related new
development and expansion of existing businesses
resulting from the agroforestry program;
(3) Suggests methods to promote the
development of wood and other forestry related
products;
(4) Suggests public or private sector
initiatives or methods which will result in
significant increases in job opportunities and
employment.
2. The report shall be submitted to the
governor and to the general assembly by January
thirty-first of each of the following years:
1996, 2001, 2006, 2011, 2016, 2021, and 2026.]
[252.330. During the establishment phase,
the director may pay for the planting of trees
on eligible land which is used for agroforestry
pursuant to sections 252.300 to 252.333. Such
payment shall be limited to expenses which are
determined to be reasonable and necessary by the

SB 1514 8
director, but shall not exceed seventy-five
percent of the cost of establishment.]
[252.333. The director may make incentive
payments for agroforestry purposes of land
enrolled in this program. The duration of such
payments shall not exceed ten years. The
director may also expend funds to plant trees on
such land. Such expenditures may include both
planting and associated practices as determined
by the director.]
✓